Colorado, session 2026A, HB1324.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-20-102, amend (1);
and add (1.5) as follows:
12-20-102. Definitions.
As used in this title 12, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying, pursuant to a part or
article of this title 12, for a new license, certification, or registration or to
renew, reinstate, or reactivate a license, certification, or registration that is
authorized pursuant to that part or article (a) "ADMINISTRATIVE TASK"
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

MEANS A TASK THAT IS MINISTERIAL OR ADMINISTRATIVE IN NATURE, THAT
HAS A FIXED AND CERTAIN STANDARD, AND THAT DOES NOT REQUIRE A
SUBORDINATE EMPLOYEE TO EXERCISE SIGNIFICANT JUDGMENT OR
DISCRETION.
(b) "ADMINISTRATIVE TASK" DOES NOT INCLUDE DISCIPLINARY
ACTION TAKEN PURSUANT TO SECTION 12-20-404.
(1.5) "APPLICANT" MEANS A PERSON APPLYING, PURSUANT TO A
PART OR ARTICLE OF THIS TITLE 12, FOR A NEW LICENSE, CERTIFICATION, OR
REGISTRATION OR TO RENEW, REINSTATE, OR REACTIVATE A LICENSE,
CERTIFICATION, OR REGISTRATION THAT IS AUTHORIZED PURSUANT TO THAT
PART OR ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 12-20-409 as
follows:
12-20-409. Delegation of administrative tasks.
(1) A REGULATOR MAY DELEGATE AUTHORITY FOR ADMINISTRATIVE
TASKS AUTHORIZED BY THIS TITLE 12 OR OTHER TASKS SPECIFICALLY
AUTHORIZED THROUGH THE POLICY OF A BOARD OR COMMISSION TO A
DESIGNEE AT THE REGULATOR'S DISCRETION.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION, UNLESS A
REGULATOR IDENTIFIES SPECIFIC CRITERIA TO GOVERN THE REGULATOR'S
DELEGATE IN MAKING A DETERMINATION, A REGULATOR SHALL NOT
DELEGATE THE FOLLOWING TASKS:
(a) COMMENCEMENT OF A HEARING ON AN ORDER TO SHOW CAUSE
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 12-20-405 (2)(c)(I); OR
(b) APPLICATION FOR INJUNCTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION
12-20-406.
(3) ALL TASKS DELEGATED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION BY A
REGULATOR THAT IS NOT THE DIRECTOR MUST BE RATIFIED AT THE NEXT
MEETING OF THE RELEVANT REGULATORY BOARD OR COMMISSION.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-20-404, amend
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1324

(4)(a), (4)(b)(I), and (5)(a) as follows:
12-20-404. Disciplinary actions - regulator powers - disposition
of fines - mistreatment of at-risk adult - exceptions - definitions.
(4) Letter of admonition.
(a) When a complaint or investigation discloses an instance of
misconduct that, in the opinion of a regulator, does not warrant formal
action by the regulator but that should not be dismissed as being without
merit, the regulator may issue and send a letter of admonition to the
licensee, certificate holder, or registrant. A LETTER SENT PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (4)(a) MAY BE SENT BY EMAIL IF THE LICENSEE, CERTIFICATE
HOLDER, OR REGISTRANT CONFIRMS RECEIPT OF THE EMAIL WITHIN SEVEN
CALENDAR DAYS. IF THE LICENSEE, CERTIFICATE HOLDER, OR REGISTRANT
DOES NOT CONFIRM RECEIPT OF THE EMAIL WITHIN SEVEN CALENDAR DAYS,
THE REGULATOR SHALL SEND THE LETTER OF ADMONITION THROUGH
FIRST-CLASS UNITED STATES MAIL.
(b) (I) When a regulator sends a letter of admonition to a licensee,
certificate holder, or registrant pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section,
the regulator shall also advise the licensee, certificate holder, or registrant
that the person has the right to request in writing, within twenty
TWENTY-FIVE CALENDAR days after receipt ISSUANCE of the letter, that the
regulator initiate formal disciplinary proceedings to adjudicate the propriety
of the conduct upon which the letter of admonition is based.
(5) Confidential letter of concern.
(a) When a complaint or investigation discloses an instance of
conduct that does not warrant formal action by a regulator and, in the
opinion of the regulator, should be dismissed, but the regulator has noticed
indications of possible errant conduct by the licensee, certificate holder, or
registrant that could lead to serious consequences if not corrected, the
regulator may or shall, in accordance with the part or article of this title 12
governing the particular profession or occupation, send the licensee,
certificate holder, or registrant a confidential letter of concern. A LETTER
SENT PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (5)(a) MAY BE SENT BY EMAIL IF THE
LICENSEE, CERTIFICATE HOLDER, OR REGISTRANT CONFIRMS RECEIPT OF THE
EMAIL WITHIN SEVEN CALENDAR DAYS. IF THE LICENSEE, CERTIFICATE
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1324

HOLDER, OR REGISTRANT DOES NOT CONFIRM RECEIPT OF THE EMAIL WITHIN
SEVEN CALENDAR DAYS, THE REGULATOR SHALL SEND THE CONFIDENTIAL
LETTER OF CONCERN THROUGH FIRST-CLASS UNITED STATES MAIL.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-20-202, add (7) as
follows:
12-20-202. Licenses, certifications, and registrations - renewal
- reinstatement - fees - occupational credential portability program -
exceptions for military personnel, spouses, gold star military spouses,
and dependents - rules - consideration of criminal convictions or
driver's history - executive director authority - email communications
- definitions.
(7) Email communications. NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER
PROVISION OF THIS TITLE 12, A REGULATOR MAY PROVIDE COMMUNICATIONS
REQUIRED BY THIS TITLE 12 THROUGH EMAIL. FOR A DISCIPLINARY ACTION
TAKEN PURSUANT TO SECTION 12-20-404, THE REGULATOR MAY PROVIDE
COMMUNICATIONS THROUGH EMAIL IF THE LICENSEE, CERTIFICATE HOLDER,
OR REGISTRANT CONFIRMS RECEIPT OF THE EMAIL WITHIN SEVEN CALENDAR
DAYS. IF THE LICENSEE, CERTIFICATE HOLDER, OR REGISTRANT DOES NOT
CONFIRM RECEIPT OF THE EMAIL WITHIN SEVEN CALENDAR DAYS, THE
REGULATOR SHALL SEND THE COMMUNICATIONS THROUGH FIRST-CLASS
UNITED STATES MAIL.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-20-405, amend
(2)(b) as follows:
12-20-405. Cease-and-desist orders.
(2) (b) The regulator shall promptly notify the person of the issuance
of the order to show cause and shall include in the notice a copy of the
order, the factual and legal basis for the order, and the date set by the
regulator for a hearing on the order. The regulator may serve the notice by
EMAIL, BY personal service, by first-class United States mail, postage
prepaid, or as may be practicable upon any person against whom the order
is issued. Personal service or proof of receipt of mailing of an order or
document pursuant to this subsection (2)(b) constitutes notice to the person
of the existence and contents of the order or document. IF THE REGULATOR
SENDS THE NOTICE THROUGH EMAIL, THE REGULATOR SHALL REQUEST THAT
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1324

THE PERSON CONFIRM RECEIPT OF THE EMAIL WITHIN SEVEN CALENDAR
DAYS. IF THE PERSON DOES NOT CONFIRM RECEIPT OF THE EMAIL WITHIN
SEVEN CALENDAR DAYS, THE REGULATOR SHALL SEND THE NOTICE THROUGH
PERSONAL SERVICE OR FIRST-CLASS UNITED STATES MAIL, POSTAGE
PREPAID.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-110-111, amend
(2)(b)(IV) as follows:
12-110-111. Grounds for discipline.
(2) (b) Upon completing an investigation in accordance with section
12-20-403, the director shall make one of the following findings:
(IV) The investigation discloses an instance of conduct that does not
warrant formal action but should not be dismissed as being without merit.
If this finding is made, the director may send a letter of admonition to the
licensee in accordance with section 12-20-404 (4). by certified mail.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-100-124, amend
(2)(b)(IV) as follows:
12-100-124. Investigations - findings - board actions -
confidentiality of complaints.
(2) (b) Upon completing an investigation, the board shall make one
of the following findings:
(IV) The investigation discloses an instance of conduct that does not
warrant formal action but should not be dismissed as being without merit.
If this finding is made, the board may send a letter of admonition in
accordance with section 12-20-404 (4) to the licensee or registrant by
certified mail OR EMAIL.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-20-206, amend (2)
as follows:
12-120-206. Disciplinary actions - grounds for discipline.
(2) The board may issue and send a letter of admonition by
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1324

first-class mail OR EMAIL to a professional engineer or engineer-intern at the
individual's last-known address under the circumstances specified in and in
accordance with section 12-20-404 (4).
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-120-306, amend (2)
as follows:
12-120-306. Disciplinary actions - grounds for discipline.
(2) The board may issue and send a letter of admonition by
first-class mail OR EMAIL to a professional land surveyor or land
surveyor-intern at the individual's last-known address under the
circumstances specified in and in accordance with section 12-20-404 (4).
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-120-406, amend
(2) as follows:
12-120-406. Disciplinary actions - grounds for discipline.
(2) The board may issue and send a letter of admonition by
first-class mail OR EMAIL to a licensee at the licensee's last-known address
under the circumstances specified in and in accordance with section
12-20-404 (4).
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-130-113, amend
(2) and (3) as follows:
12-130-113. Disciplinary actions by board - procedures.
(2) The board may issue and send to a licensee, by certified mail OR
EMAIL, a written letter of admonition under the circumstances specified in
and in accordance with section 12-20-404 (4).
(3) The board may send a confidential letter of concern to a licensee
under the circumstances specified in section 12-20-404 (5). The confidential
letter of concern and notice of the issuance of the letter shall be sent to the
licensee by certified mail OR EMAIL. Issuance of a confidential letter of
concern shall not be construed to be discipline.
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-155-123, amend
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1324

(3)(b) as follows:
12-155-123. Violation - fines - rules.
(3) (b) A citation or copy of a citation issued pursuant to this section
may be served by certified mail, BY EMAIL, or in person by the program
director or the program director's designee upon a person or the person's
agent in accordance with rule 4 of the Colorado rules of civil procedure. IF
THE PROGRAM DIRECTOR OR THE PROGRAM DIRECTOR'S DESIGNEE SENDS THE
NOTICE THROUGH EMAIL, THE PROGRAM DIRECTOR OR THE PROGRAM
DIRECTOR'S DESIGNEE SHALL REQUEST THAT THE PERSON CONFIRM RECEIPT
OF THE EMAIL WITHIN SEVEN CALENDAR DAYS. IF THE PERSON DOES NOT
CONFIRM RECEIPT OF THE EMAIL WITHIN SEVEN CALENDAR DAYS, THE
PROGRAM DIRECTOR OR THE PROGRAM DIRECTOR'S DESIGNEE SHALL SEND
THE NOTICE THROUGH FIRST-CLASS UNITED STATES MAIL.
SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-200-110, amend
(2)(c) as follows:
12-200-110. Disciplinary authority and proceedings.
(2) Disciplinary actions may consist of the following:
(c) Issuing and sending a letter of admonition by first-class mail OR
EMAIL to the licensee under the circumstances specified in and in
accordance with section 12-20-404 (4); and
SECTION 14. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-215-118, amend
(7) as follows:
12-215-118. Disciplinary proceedings.
(7) The board may send a letter of admonition by certified mail OR
EMAIL to a chiropractor against whom a complaint was made under the
circumstances specified in and in accordance with section 12-20-404 (4)
and shall also send a copy of the letter of admonition to the person making
the complaint.
SECTION 15. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-240-125, amend
(4)(a)(I) as follows:
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1324

12-240-125. Disciplinary action by board - rules.
(4) (a) (I) Written complaints relating to the conduct of a licensee
licensed or authorized to practice medicine in this state may be made by any
person or may be initiated by an inquiry panel of the board on its own
motion. The licensee complained of shall be given notice by first-class mail
OR EMAIL of the nature of the complaint and shall be given thirty days to
answer or explain in writing the matters described in such complaint. Upon
receipt of the licensee's answer or at the conclusion of thirty days,
whichever occurs first, the inquiry panel may take further action as set forth
in subsection (4)(a)(II) of this section. IF THE INQUIRY PANEL SENDS THE
NOTICE THROUGH EMAIL, THE INQUIRY PANEL SHALL REQUEST THAT THE
LICENSEE CONFIRM RECEIPT OF THE EMAIL WITHIN SEVEN CALENDAR DAYS.
IF THE LICENSEE DOES NOT CONFIRM RECEIPT OF THE EMAIL WITHIN SEVEN
CALENDAR DAYS, THE INQUIRY PANEL SHALL SEND THE NOTICE THROUGH
FIRST-CLASS UNITED STATES MAIL.
SECTION 16. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-245-225, amend
(1)(a) as follows:
12-245-225. Authority of boards - cease-and-desist orders - rules
- fines.
(1) If a licensee, registrant, or certificate holder violates any
provision of section 12-245-224, the board that licenses, registers, or
certifies the licensee, registrant, or certificate holder may, in accordance
with section 12-20-404:
(a) Issue and send, by certified mail OR EMAIL, a letter of admonition
to a licensee, registrant, or certificate holder under the circumstances
specified in and in accordance with section 12-20-404 (4);
SECTION 17. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-255-119, amend
(3)(a)(II) as follows:
12-255-119. Disciplinary procedures of the board - inquiry and
hearings panels - mental and physical examinations - definitions - rules.
(3) (a) (II) Written complaints relating to the conduct of a nurse
licensed or authorized to practice nursing in this state or relating to the
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1324

conduct of a certified midwife licensed or authorized to practice as a
certified midwife in this state may be made by any person or may be
initiated by an inquiry panel of the board on its own motion. Unless the
board determines the complaint to be without merit of investigation, the
board shall give notice of the complaint to the nurse or certified midwife
complained of, by first-class mail OR EMAIL, and shall state in the notice the
nature of the complaint and that the failure to respond in a materially factual
and timely manner constitutes grounds for discipline. The nurse or certified
midwife complained of shall be given thirty days to answer or explain in
writing the matters described in the complaint. Upon receipt of the nurse's
or certified midwife's answer or at the conclusion of thirty days, whichever
occurs first, the inquiry panel may take further action as set forth in
subsection (3)(a)(III) of this section. IF THE BOARD SENDS THE NOTICE
THROUGH EMAIL, THE BOARD SHALL REQUEST THAT THE NURSE OR CERTIFIED
MIDWIFE CONFIRM RECEIPT OF THE EMAIL WITHIN SEVEN CALENDAR DAYS.
IF THE NURSE OR CERTIFIED MIDWIFE DOES NOT CONFIRM RECEIPT OF THE
EMAIL WITHIN SEVEN CALENDAR DAYS, THE BOARD SHALL SEND THE NOTICE
THROUGH FIRST-CLASS UNITED STATES MAIL.
SECTION 18. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-255-212, amend
(12) as follows:
12-255-212. Disciplinary proceedings - hearing officers.
(12) Except when a decision to proceed with a disciplinary action
has been agreed upon by a majority of the board or its designee and notice
of formal complaint is drafted and served on the licensee by first-class mail
OR EMAIL, any investigations, examinations, hearings, meetings, or any
other proceedings of the board related to discipline that are conducted
pursuant to this section are exempt from the open records provisions of
article 72 of title 24 requiring that the proceedings of the board be
conducted publicly or that the minutes or records of the board with respect
to action of the board taken pursuant to this section be open to public
inspection.
SECTION 19. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-275-122, amend
(3) as follows:
12-275-122. Discipline - procedure - professional review -
immunity - reconsideration and review of action by board - rules.
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1324

(3) The board may send a letter of admonition by certified mail OR
EMAIL to a licensee under the circumstances specified in and in accordance
with section 12-20-404 (4).
SECTION 20. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-290-113, amend
(2)(a) as follows:
12-290-113. Disciplinary action by board.
(2) (a) Complaints in writing relating to the conduct of any podiatrist
licensed or authorized to practice podiatry in this state may be made by any
person or may be initiated by the board on its own motion. The podiatrist
complained of shall be given notice by first-class mail OR EMAIL of the
nature of all matters complained of within thirty days of the receipt of the
complaint or initiation of the complaint by the board and shall be given
thirty days to make explanation or answer thereto.
SECTION 21. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-295-109, amend
(4) as follows:
12-295-109. Approved psychiatric technician education
program.
(4) The board shall examine, from time to time, the approved
psychiatric technician education programs of all institutions in the state with
approved programs. The executive secretary or other authorized
representative of the board shall conduct the examinations and submit the
examination results to the board in the form of written reports. If the board
determines that an institution with an approved psychiatric technician
education program is not maintaining the standards required by this article
295, the board shall serve notice of its determination in writing, specifying
the defect, on the institution by EMAIL OR certified mail, postage prepaid,
return receipt requested. If the institution receiving the notice fails, within
one year after mailing of OR EMAILING the notice, to correct the conditions
complained of in the notice, the board shall revoke the institution's authority
to conduct an approved psychiatric technician education program. An
institution has the right, at any time before the expiration of one year from
the date it receives the notice, to demand and be granted a hearing before
the board. In case of a demand, the board shall not take action until after the
hearing. IF THE BOARD SENDS THE NOTICE THROUGH EMAIL, THE BOARD
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1324

SHALL REQUEST THAT THE INSTITUTION CONFIRM RECEIPT OF THE EMAIL
WITHIN SEVEN CALENDAR DAYS. IF THE INSTITUTION DOES NOT CONFIRM
RECEIPT OF THE EMAIL WITHIN SEVEN CALENDAR DAYS, THE BOARD SHALL
SEND THE NOTICE THROUGH FIRST-CLASS UNITED STATES MAIL.
SECTION 22. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-300-109, amend
(11)(b) as follows:
12-300-109. Grounds for action - disciplinary proceedings.
(11) (b) Subsection (11)(a) of this section shall not apply after the
director has made a decision to proceed with a disciplinary action and has
served by first-class mail OR EMAIL a notice of formal complaint on the
licensee. IF THE DIRECTOR SENDS THE NOTICE THROUGH EMAIL, THE
DIRECTOR SHALL REQUEST THAT THE LICENSEE CONFIRM RECEIPT OF THE
EMAIL WITHIN SEVEN CALENDAR DAYS. IF THE LICENSEE DOES NOT CONFIRM
RECEIPT OF THE EMAIL WITHIN SEVEN CALENDAR DAYS, THE DIRECTOR
SHALL SEND THE NOTICE THROUGH FIRST-CLASS UNITED STATES MAIL.
SECTION 23. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-20-104, amend (1)
as follows:
12-20-104. Renewal fees - report to joint budget committee -
definition.
(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, there is
imposed, and the executive director shall collect, an excise tax ADDITIONAL
FEE of one dollar for each year of the renewal period upon the payment of
renewal fees that are required to be paid by individuals for the renewal of
a license, registration, or certificate granting the individual authority or
permission from the state to continue the practice of a profession or
occupation; except that the excise tax ADDITIONAL FEE shall not be imposed
on the renewal fee paid by nurse aides pursuant to section 12-255-107.
SECTION 24. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-20-105, amend
(5)(a) as follows:
12-20-105. Fee adjustments - division of professions and
occupations cash fund created - legal defense account created - general
fund transfer - definition - repeal.
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1324

(5) (a) The excise tax FEE collected pursuant to section 12-20-104
shall be credited to the legal defense account, which account is hereby
created within the division of professions and occupations cash fund. The
excise tax FEE is the sole source of funding for the account, and no other fee
or portion of a fee collected by a regulator and credited to the division of
professions and occupations cash fund shall be deposited in or transferred
to the account. The account shall be used to supplement revenues REVENUE
received by the division but shall only be used for the purpose of paying
legal expenses incurred by a regulator. Upon a determination of the need of
a regulator for additional revenues REVENUE for the payment of legal
expenses, the director may authorize the allocation of revenues REVENUE
from the legal defense account to a regulator for legal expenses.
SECTION 25. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-120-211, recreate
and reenact, with amendments, (1) as follows:
12-120-211. Qualifications for engineer-interns.
(1) (a) AN APPLICANT MAY QUALIFY FOR ENROLLMENT AS AN
ENGINEER-INTERN BY ENDORSEMENT IF THE APPLICANT IS ENROLLED IN
GOOD STANDING IN ANOTHER JURISDICTION REQUIRING QUALIFICATIONS
SUBSTANTIALLY EQUIVALENT TO THOSE CURRENTLY REQUIRED OF
APPLICANTS UNDER THIS PART 2 OR IF, AT THE TIME OF INITIAL ENROLLMENT
IN THE OTHER JURISDICTION, THE APPLICANT MET THE REQUIREMENTS FOR
ENROLLMENT THEN IN EXISTENCE UNDER COLORADO LAW.
(b) UPON COMPLETION OF THE APPLICATION AND APPROVAL BY THE
BOARD, AN APPLICANT QUALIFIED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL BE ENROLLED AS AN ENGINEER-INTERN IF THE APPLICANT IS
OTHERWISE QUALIFIED PURSUANT TO SECTION 12-120-210.
SECTION 26. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-120-213, recreate
and reenact, with amendments, (1) as follows:
12-120-213. Qualifications for professional engineer.
(1) (a) AN APPLICANT MAY QUALIFY FOR LICENSING AS A
PROFESSIONAL ENGINEER BY ENDORSEMENT IF THE APPLICANT IS LICENSED
IN GOOD STANDING IN ANOTHER JURISDICTION REQUIRING QUALIFICATIONS
SUBSTANTIALLY EQUIVALENT TO THOSE CURRENTLY REQUIRED OF
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1324

APPLICANTS UNDER THIS PART 2 OR IF, AT THE TIME OF INITIAL LICENSURE IN
THE OTHER JURISDICTION, THE APPLICANT MET THE REQUIREMENTS FOR
LICENSURE THEN IN EXISTENCE UNDER COLORADO LAW.
(b) UPON COMPLETION OF THE APPLICATION AND APPROVAL BY THE
BOARD, AN APPLICANT QUALIFIED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL BE LICENSED AS A PROFESSIONAL ENGINEER IF THE
APPLICANT IS OTHERWISE QUALIFIED PURSUANT TO SECTION 12-120-212.
SECTION 27. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-120-215, recreate
and reenact, with amendments, (1)(a)(III) and (1)(b)(III) as follows:
12-120-215. Fees - disposition.
(1) Pursuant to section 12-20-105, the board shall charge and collect
fees for the following:
(a) With respect to professional engineers:
(III) APPLICATION FOR LICENSURE BY ENDORSEMENT;
(b) With respect to engineer-interns:
(III) APPLICATION FOR ENROLLMENT BY ENDORSEMENT.
SECTION 28. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-120-311, recreate
and reenact, with amendments, (1) as follows:
12-120-311. Qualifications for land surveyor-interns.
(1) (a) AN APPLICANT MAY QUALIFY FOR ENROLLMENT AS A LAND
SURVEYOR-INTERN BY ENDORSEMENT IF THE APPLICANT IS ENROLLED IN
GOOD STANDING IN ANOTHER JURISDICTION REQUIRING QUALIFICATIONS
SUBSTANTIALLY EQUIVALENT TO THOSE CURRENTLY REQUIRED OF
APPLICANTS UNDER THIS PART 3 OR IF, AT THE TIME OF INITIAL ENROLLMENT
IN THE OTHER JURISDICTION, THE APPLICANT MET THE REQUIREMENTS FOR
ENROLLMENT THEN IN EXISTENCE UNDER COLORADO LAW.
(b) UPON COMPLETION OF THE APPLICATION AND APPROVAL BY THE
BOARD, AN APPLICANT QUALIFIED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1324

SECTION SHALL BE ENROLLED AS A LAND SURVEYOR-INTERN IF THE
APPLICANT IS OTHERWISE QUALIFIED PURSUANT TO SECTION 12-120-310.
SECTION 29. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-120-313, recreate
and reenact, with amendments, (1) as follows:
12-120-313. Qualifications for professional land surveyor.
(1) (a) AN APPLICANT MAY QUALIFY FOR LICENSING AS A
PROFESSIONAL LAND SURVEYOR BY ENDORSEMENT AND EXAMINATION IF THE
APPLICANT PASSES THE APPROPRIATE EXAMINATION AS ADOPTED BY THE
BOARD IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 12-120-104 (3)(b) AND THE
EXAMINATION PERTAINING TO COLORADO LAW.
(b) TO BE ADMITTED TO AN EXAMINATION PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(1)(a) OF THIS SECTION, AN APPLICANT MUST BE LICENSED IN GOOD
STANDING IN ANOTHER JURISDICTION REQUIRING QUALIFICATIONS
SUBSTANTIALLY EQUIVALENT TO THOSE CURRENTLY REQUIRED OF
APPLICANTS UNDER THIS PART 3 OR, AT THE TIME OF INITIAL LICENSURE IN
THE OTHER JURISDICTION, MUST HAVE MET THE REQUIREMENTS FOR
LICENSURE THEN IN EXISTENCE UNDER COLORADO LAW.
(c) UPON PASSING THE APPROPRIATE EXAMINATIONS, AN APPLICANT
QUALIFIED FOR LICENSING BY ENDORSEMENT AND EXAMINATION PURSUANT
TO THIS SUBSECTION (1) SHALL BE LICENSED AS A PROFESSIONAL LAND
SURVEYOR IF THE APPLICANT IS OTHERWISE QUALIFIED PURSUANT TO
SECTION 12-120-312.
SECTION 30. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-120-315, recreate
and reenact, with amendments, (1)(a)(III) and (1)(b)(III) as follows:
12-120-315. Fees - disposition.
(1) Pursuant to section 12-20-105, the board shall charge and collect
fees for the following:
(a) With respect to professional land surveyors:
(III) APPLICATION FOR LICENSURE BY ENDORSEMENT AND
EXAMINATION;
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1324

(b) With respect to land surveyor-interns:
(III) APPLICATION FOR ENROLLMENT AS A LAND SURVEYOR-INTERN
BY ENDORSEMENT.
SECTION 31. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 15-HOUSE BILL 26-1324

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 16-HOUSE BILL 26-1324